Hawaii statutes.
§321-1.4 Office of health care assurance
special fund; deposits; expenditures. [Section effective until December
31, 2016. For section effective January 1, 2017, see below.] (a) There is
established within the department of health, to be administered by the
department of health, the office of health care assurance special fund into
which shall be deposited moneys collected under section 321-11.5(b) and all
administrative penalties imposed and collected by the office of health care
assurance pursuant to section 321-20.

(b) Moneys in the special fund shall be
expended by the department of health:

(1) To assist in offsetting operating costs and
educational program expenses of the department of health's office of health
care assurance; and

(2) For the purpose of enhancing the capacity of
office of health care assurance programs to:

(A) Improve public health outreach efforts,
program and community development, and consultations to industries regulated;
and

(B) Educate the public, the staff of the department
of health, [and] other departments within the State, as well as staff and
providers of all health care facilities and agencies regulated.

Not more than $300,000 of the special fund may be
used during any fiscal year for the activities carried out by the office of
health care assurance.

(c) Any amount in the special fund in excess
of $356,000 on June 30 of each year shall be deposited into the general fund.

(d) The department of health shall submit a
report to the legislature concerning the status of the special fund, including
the amount of moneys deposited into and expended from the special fund, and the
sources of receipts and uses of expenditures, no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session. [L 1999, c 120, §1; am L 2002, c 188,
§1; am L 2007, c 90, §1]

§321-1.4 Office of health care assurance
special fund; deposits; expenditures. [Section effective January 1,
2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see above.] (a)
There is established within the department of health, to be administered by the
department of health, the office of health care assurance special fund into
which shall be deposited moneys collected under section 321-11.5(b), license
fees for the administration of the durable medical equipment supplier license
program collected pursuant to section 321-544, and all administrative penalties
imposed and collected by the office of health care assurance pursuant to
section 321-20.

(b) Moneys in the special fund shall be
expended by the department of health:

(1) To assist in offsetting operating costs and
educational program expenses of the department of health's office of health
care assurance; and

(2) For the purpose of enhancing the capacity of
office of health care assurance programs to:

(A) Improve public health outreach efforts,
program and community development, and consultations to industries regulated;

(B) Educate the public, the staff of the
department of health, and other departments within the State, as well as staff
and providers of all health care facilities and agencies regulated; and

(C) Administer and support the durable
medical equipment supplier license program established pursuant to part XLIII.

Not more than $327,000 of the special fund may be
used during any fiscal year for the activities carried out by the office of
health care assurance.

(c) Any amount in the special fund in excess
of $387,500 on June 30 of each year shall be deposited into the general fund.

(d) The department of health shall submit a
report to the legislature concerning the status of the special fund, including
the amount of moneys deposited into and expended from the special fund, and the
sources of receipts and uses of expenditures, no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session. [L 1999, c 120, §1; am L 2002, c 188,
§1; am L 2007, c 90, §1; am L 2016, c 137, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next